Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.160

Books and records.

Each corporation shall keep correct and complete books and records of account and shall keep minutes of the proceedings of its members, shareholders, board of directors, and committees having any of the authority of the board of directors; and shall keep at its registered office or principal office in this state a record of the names and addresses of its members and shareholders entitled to vote. All books and records of a corporation may be inspected by any member or shareholder, or his or her agent or attorney, for any proper purpose at any reasonable time.

[ 2011 c 336 s 668; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 32.]